California statutes. Public Resources Code
In furtherance of the conservancy’s role in implementing the Delta Plan, the conservancy may take or fund an action outside the Delta and Suisun Marsh if the board makes all of the following findings:

(a) The project implements the ecosystem goals of the Delta Plan.

(b) The project is consistent with the requirements of any applicable state and federal permits.

(c) The conservancy has given notice to and reviewed any comments received from affected local jurisdictions and the Delta Protection Commission.

(d) The conservancy has
 given notice to and reviewed any comments received from any state conservancy where the project is located.

(e) The project will provide significant benefits to the Delta.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32362.

The conservancy may engage in partnerships with nonprofit organizations, local public agencies, and landowners.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32363.

In implementing this division, the conservancy shall cooperate and consult with the city or county in which a grant is proposed to be expended or an interest in real property is proposed to be acquired, and shall, as necessary or appropriate, coordinate its efforts with other state agencies, in cooperation with the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency. The conservancy shall, as necessary or appropriate, cooperate and consult with a public water system, levee, flood control, or drainage agency that owns or operates facilities, including lands appurtenant thereto, where a grant is proposed to be expended or an interest in land is proposed to be acquired.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32364.

(a) The conservancy may require a grantee to enter into an agreement with the conservancy on terms and conditions specified by the conservancy.

(b) The conservancy may require a cost-share or local funding requirement for a grant. The conservancy may make that cost-share or local funding requirement contingent upon the total amount of funding available, the fiscal resources of the applicant, or urgency of the project. The conservancy may waive cost-share requirements.

(c) The conservancy may fund or award grants for plans and feasibility studies consistent with its strategic plan or the Delta Plan.

(d) The conservancy may seek repayment or reimbursement of funds granted on terms and conditions it deems appropriate. The proceeds of repayment shall be deposited in the fund.

(e) The conservancy may require any funds that exceed the costs of eligible or approved projects or of acquisition to be returned to the conservancy, to be available for expenditure when appropriated by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32364.5.

(a) The conservancy may provide grants and loans to state agencies, local public agencies, and nonprofit organizations to further the goals of the conservancy.

(b) An entity applying for a grant from the conservancy to acquire an interest in real property shall specify all of the following in the grant application:

(1) The intended use of the property.

(2) The manner in which the land will be managed.

(3) How the cost of ongoing operations, maintenance, and management will be provided, including an analysis
 of the maintaining entity’s financial capacity to support those ongoing costs.

(4) Grantees shall demonstrate, where applicable, how they will provide payments in lieu of taxes, assessments, or charges otherwise due to local government.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32365.

The conservancy may sue and be sued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32366.

(a) The conservancy may acquire from willing sellers or transferors interests in real property and improve, lease, or transfer interests in real property, in order to carry out the purposes of this division.

(b) The conservancy shall use conservation easements to accomplish ecosystem restoration whenever feasible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32368.

The conservancy may enter into an agreement with a public agency, nonprofit organization, or private entity for the construction, management, or maintenance of facilities authorized by the conservancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32370.

The conservancy shall not exercise the power of eminent domain.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32372.

(a) The conservancy may pursue and accept funds from various sources, including, but not limited to, federal, state, and local funds or grants, gifts, donations, bequests, devises, subventions, grants, rents, royalties, or other assistance and funds from public and private sources.

(b) The conservancy may accept fees levied by others.

(c) The conservancy may create and manage endowments.

(d) All funds received by the conservancy shall be deposited in the fund for expenditure for the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32376.

Within two years of hiring an executive officer, the board shall prepare and adopt a strategic plan to achieve the goals of the conservancy. The plan shall describe its interaction with local, regional, state, and federal land use, recreation, water and flood management, and habitat conservation and protection efforts within and adjacent to the Delta. The strategic plan shall establish priorities and criteria for projects and programs, based upon an assessment of program requirements, institutional capabilities, and funding needs throughout the Delta. The strategic plan shall be consistent with the Delta Plan, the Delta Protection Commission’s resources management plan, the Central Valley Flood Protection Plan, the Suisun Marsh Preservation Act of 1977 (Division 19 (commencing with
 Section 29000)), and the Habitat Management, Preservation and Restoration Plan for the Suisun Marsh.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32378.

(a) The conservancy may expend funds and award grants and loans to facilitate collaborative planning efforts and to develop projects and programs that are designed to further the purposes of this division.

(b) The conservancy may provide and make available technical information, expertise, and other nonfinancial assistance to public agencies, nonprofit organizations, and tribal organizations, to support program and project development and implementation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32380.

The conservancy may acquire water or water rights to support the goals of the conservancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

32381.

This division does not grant to the conservancy any of the following:

(a) The power of a city or county to regulate land use.

(b) The power to regulate any activities on land, except as the owner of an interest in the land, or pursuant to an agreement with, or a license or grant of management authority from, the owner of an interest in the land.

(c) The power over water rights held by others.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 22.5. SAN JOAQUIN RIVER CONSERVANCY [32500. - 32538.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [32500. - 32506.]

32500.

This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the San Joaquin River Conservancy Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32501.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the San Joaquin River, its broad corridors, and its prominent bluffs constitute a unique and important environmental, cultural, scientific, agricultural, educational, recreational, scenic, flood water conveyance, and wildlife resource that should be preserved for the enjoyment of, and appreciation by, present and future generations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32502.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the San Joaquin River Parkway Task Force, representing diverse state and local interests, has developed a San Joaquin River Parkway Plan which, in concept, outlines and provides a structural framework for ideas for establishing the San Joaquin River Parkway. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this division to implement the task force recommendation for a managing entity for the proposed parkway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32503.

The Legislature further finds and declares that local jurisdiction is divided among the County of Fresno, the County of Madera, and the City of Fresno. Additionally, the state has property interests in the river bottom. It is the intent of the Legislature that the San Joaquin River Conservancy shall promote the parkway and coordinate efforts and mediate differences among the local jurisdictions and the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32504.

As used in this division:

(a) “Board” means the governing board of the San Joaquin River Conservancy.

(b) “Conservancy” means the San Joaquin River Conservancy.

(c) “Member agencies” means the City of Fresno and Counties of Fresno and Madera.

(d) “Nonprofit organization” means an exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(e) “Parkway” means the San Joaquin River Parkway, as described in Section 32510.

(f) “Tribal organization” means an Indian tribe, band, nation, or other organized group or community, or a tribal agency authorized by a tribe, which is one or both of the following:

(1) Recognized by the United States Secretary of the Interior and identified within the most current Federal Register.

(2) Listed on the contact list maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission as a California Native American tribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 171, Sec. 1.   (AB 559)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

32505.

The conservancy shall commence to function upon the occurrence of either of the following events:

(a) Approval by a four-fifths vote of the governing bodies of the member agencies.

(b) Approval by a majority of the voters voting on the proposition of whether the conservancy should commence to function at an election called for that purpose by the Boards of Supervisors of Fresno and Madera Counties within those counties. The election may be consolidated with any other election within those counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32506.

If the governing body of any member agency approves formation of the conservancy by a four-fifths vote, the election may be held only within the member agency or agencies not so approving formation.

If one member agency fails to approve the formation of the conservancy and it is not approved by the voters of that member agency, the conservancy may function to acquire and maintain parkway lands only within the jurisdictions of the approving member agencies. A member agency may withdraw from the conservancy within one year after the conservancy commences to function.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. The San Joaquin River Conservancy [32510. - 32520.]

32510.

The San Joaquin River Conservancy is hereby established in the Resources Agency to acquire and manage public lands within the San Joaquin River Parkway, which shall consist of the San Joaquin River and approximately 5,900 acres on both sides of the river between Friant Dam and the Highway 99 crossing. Approximately 1,900 acres of the parkway shall be located in Madera County and 4,000 acres in Fresno County, of which approximately 1,250 acres are already in public ownership. The conservancy shall acquire and manage these lands in the parkway to provide a harmonious combination of low-impact recreational and educational uses and wildlife protection through the preservation of the San Joaquin River, existing publicly owned lands, the wildlife corridor, and natural reserves.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

32511.

The conservancy shall be responsible for operation and maintenance of the parkway. The conservancy shall close to the public any lands or facilities which it is unable to maintain in a clean and safe manner and to adequately protect the wildlife and rights of adjacent property owners from the public, including areas downstream from the Highway 99 crossing affected by the use of the parkway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32512.

The area under the jurisdiction of the conservancy includes that area of the parkway which is acquired by the conservancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 610, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

32513.

The jurisdiction of the conservancy consists of land and water areas acquired for parkway use within the parkway whether by purchase or lease; other public lands operated by the conservancy on behalf of another public agency; and private lands which are in a land mitigation bank or which are adjacent to the parkway and downstream from the Highway 99 crossing and for which the owner desires the conservancy’s management and protection services or which are subject to a voluntary resource management agreement entered into with the conservancy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32514.

The conservancy shall coordinate the activities of state and local agencies and private entities interested in the San Joaquin River and its resources. State and local agencies shall retain title to any land owned within the boundaries of the parkway. Local agencies may enter into an agreement to transfer responsibility for the management of the land to the conservancy. Where there is no state or local public agency with operating and management responsibility, the conservancy shall exercise that responsibility. All zoning or land use regulations shall remain the exclusive authority of the member agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32515.

(a) The governing board of the conservancy shall consist of 16 voting members.

(b) The 16 voting members of the board shall consist of the following:

(1) One member of the Board of Supervisors of Fresno County appointed by a majority of the members of that board. A majority of the members of the Board of Supervisors of Fresno County may appoint an alternate member from that board.

(2) The Mayor of the City of Fresno or a member of the Fresno City Council designated by the Mayor of the City of Fresno. The Mayor of the City of Fresno may designate an alternate member from the Fresno City Council.

(3) One member of the Board of Supervisors of Madera County appointed by a majority of the members of that board. A majority of the members of the Board of Supervisors of Madera County may appoint an alternate from that board.

(4) The Mayor of the City of Madera or a member of the Madera City Council designated by the Mayor of the City of Madera. The Mayor of the City of Madera may designate an alternate member from the Madera City Council.

(5) (A) The Chairperson of the Board of Directors of the Fresno Metropolitan Flood Control District or the Chairperson of the Board of Directors of the Madera Irrigation District.

(B) The Chairpersons of the Fresno Metropolitan Flood Control District and the Madera Irrigation District shall rotate
 appointments, with each chairperson serving for one term before rotating to the other chairperson. Notwithstanding Section 32517, each chairperson shall serve two-year terms.

(C) Each chairperson may appoint a designee to the board.

(6) Three public members, one of whom shall be a resident of Fresno County, one of whom shall be a resident of Madera County, and one of whom shall be a resident of the City of Fresno. The members shall be appointed according to all of the following procedures:

(A) The Senate Committee on Rules shall appoint the resident of Fresno County from a list of candidates that includes two or more individuals provided by the Board of Supervisors of Fresno County. The board of supervisors shall develop its list from a list submitted by nonprofit organizations that have a presence within that county
 and support outdoor recreation, conservation, environmental justice, or social justice issues. The board of supervisors shall have one year from the end of a term or the creation of a vacancy to submit the list to the Senate Committee on Rules. If the board of supervisors does not submit the list within that time, the Senate Committee on Rules may appoint a resident of Fresno County nominated by nonprofit organizations that have a presence within Fresno County and support outdoor recreation, conservation, environmental justice, or social justice issues.

(B) The Speaker of the Assembly shall appoint the resident of Madera County from a list of candidates that includes two or more individuals provided by the Board of Supervisors of Madera County. The board of supervisors shall develop its list from a list submitted by nonprofit organizations that have a presence within that county and support outdoor recreation, conservation, environmental
 justice, or social justice issues. The board of supervisors shall have one year from the end of a term or the creation of a vacancy to submit the list to the Speaker of the Assembly. If the board of supervisors does not submit the list within that time, the Speaker of the Assembly may appoint a resident of Madera County nominated by nonprofit organizations that have a presence within Madera County and support outdoor recreation, conservation, environmental justice, or social justice issues.

(C) The Governor shall appoint the resident of the City of Fresno from a list of candidates submitted by the Fresno City Council.

(7) One member of a California Native American tribe appointed by the Governor from a list of candidates submitted by local tribal organizations.

(8) (A) One youth member appointed
 by the Governor from lists submitted by either of the following:

(i) Youth-serving nonprofit organizations that have a presence within Fresno County or Madera County.

(ii) Institutions of higher education within Fresno County or Madera County.

(B) The youth member shall be a resident of Fresno County or Madera County and 18 to 26 years of age, inclusive, and shall not be an elected official.

(9) The Executive Director of the Wildlife Conservation Board or a member of the executive director’s staff designated by the executive director.

(10) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency or a member of the secretary’s staff designated by the secretary.

(11) The Director of Fish and Wildlife or a member of the director’s staff designated by the director.

(12) The Director of Parks and Recreation or a member of the director’s staff designated by the director.

(13) The Director of Finance or a member of the director’s staff designated by the director.

(14) The Executive Officer of the State Lands Commission or a member of the executive officer’s staff designated by the executive officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 171, Sec. 2.   (AB 559)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

32516.

A quorum shall constitute a majority of the voting members of the board. Meetings of the governing board shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 171, Sec. 3.   (AB 559)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

32517.

The voting members of the board shall serve for four-year terms. Any member who is an elected or appointed official who ceases to hold that office shall automatically cease to be a member of the board. The office of any member of the board who is required to be a resident of a member agency shall become vacant upon that member ceasing to be a resident of the member agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1171, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

32518.

Members who are not elected or appointed officials shall receive compensation in an amount set by the board, not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75) for each day, or portion thereof, and not to exceed four hundred fifty dollars ($450) in any year, while attending meetings of the board, or engaged upon official business of the board. All members shall receive reimbursement for actual, necessary, and reasonable expenses. Any member may waive compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32519.

The voting members of the board shall annually elect from among the voting members a chairperson and a vice chairperson. If the office of the chairperson or vice chairperson becomes vacant, a new chairperson or vice chairperson shall be elected by the voting members of the board to serve for the remainder of the term. A person shall not serve as chairperson for more than two consecutive terms.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 171, Sec. 5.   (AB 559)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

32520.

The conservancy shall obtain and maintain adequate liability insurance or its equivalent, and defend and indemnify the member agencies for acts or omissions of the conservancy’s agents, employees, volunteers, and servants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Powers and Duties [32525. - 32538.]

32525.

The conservancy shall have, and may exercise, all rights and powers, expressed or implied, necessary to carry out the purposes of this division, except as otherwise provided. The conservancy shall have no power to levy a tax, to regulate land use, or to exercise the power of eminent domain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32526.

The conservancy shall facilitate and coordinate the activities of its employees with personnel of the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Department of Fish and Game, and local law enforcement and rescue agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32527.

The conservancy may adopt and enforce regulations governing the use of parkway lands and activities within the parkway; the protection and management of native riparian vegetation, wildlife, and other natural resources on parkway lands; and the protection of archaeological sites.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32527.5.

(a) A person who violates any of the posted regulations adopted by the conservancy governing lands owned or managed by the conservancy is guilty of an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(b) Any regulation adopted by the conservancy governing lands owned or managed by the conservancy may be enforced by any duly authorized California peace officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 114, Sec. 1.   (AB 1506)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

32528.

The conservancy may implement the San Joaquin River Parkway Task Force Plan and may adopt and carry out management plans for the protection of the natural and recreational resources of the parkway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32529.

The conservancy may manage, operate, administer, and maintain the parkway and its facilities. Land acquired by the conservancy shall not be open to public use until the board determines there are adequate funds available for the management of those lands. The conservancy may adopt regulations governing the use by the public of conservancy lands and may provide for their enforcement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32530.

The conservancy may employ an executive officer and other staff to perform those functions that cannot be provided by the existing personnel of member agencies on a contractual basis or by volunteers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32531.

The conservancy may recruit and coordinate volunteers and experts to conduct interpretive and recreational programs and to assist with construction projects and the maintenance of parkway facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32532.

The conservancy may determine acquisition priorities and may acquire real property or any interest in real property within the parkway from willing sellers and at fair market value or on other mutually acceptable terms. The conservancy may acquire the property, itself, or may coordinate the acquisition through a member agency or other public agencies with appropriate responsibility and available funding or land to exchange. The conservancy may provide technical assistance to landowners to ensure that their activities are compatible with or enhance the parkway. The conservancy may hold remainder interests in those instances where owners desire to sell but retain a life estate, and may create and administer a mitigation land bank and arrange land exchanges. The overall objective of the conservancy shall be to assist in accomplishing land transactions that are mutually beneficial to the landowner and the parkway by adding value to the land, while meeting natural resource conservation and other parkway objectives.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32533.

The conservancy may undertake site improvement projects; regulate public access; revegetate and otherwise rehabilitate degraded areas, in consultation with other public agencies with appropriate jurisdiction and expertise; upgrade deteriorating facilities; and construct new facilities as needed for outdoor recreation, nature appreciation and interpretation, and natural resource protection. These projects may be undertaken by the conservancy itself or by member agencies, with the conservancy providing overall coordination through setting priorities for projects and assuring uniformity of approach.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32534.

The conservancy shall administer any funds appropriated to it and any revenue generated by member agencies for the parkway and contributed to the conservancy, and may expend those funds for capital improvements, land acquisition, or support of the conservancy’s operations. Subject to Section 11005 of the Government Code, the conservancy may also accept any revenue, money, grants, goods, or services contributed to the conservancy by any public agency, private entity, or person, and, upon receipt, may expend any such revenue, money, or grants for capital improvements, land acquisitions, or support of the conservancy’s operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 605, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

32535.

The conservancy may sue and be sued. The conservancy may enter into contracts and joint powers agreements with public agencies, private entities, and persons necessary for the proper discharge of the conservancy’s duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32536.

The conservancy shall be deemed a local agency for the purposes of any provision of law authorizing local agencies to borrow money and incur indebtedness. The conservancy may fix and collect fees for the use by the public of any lands owned or controlled by the conservancy. No fee shall exceed the cost of providing the service for which the fee is charged.

The fee revenue shall be deposited in the San Joaquin River Conservancy Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. The money in the fund shall be expended by the conservancy, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1012, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

32537.

(a) The conservancy may award grants to local public agencies, state agencies, federal agencies, and nonprofit organizations for the purposes of this division.

(b) Grants to nonprofit organizations for the acquisition of real property or interests in real property shall be subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The purchase price of any interest in land acquired by the nonprofit organization may not exceed fair market value as established by an appraisal approved by the conservancy.

(2) The conservancy approves the terms under which the interest in land is acquired.

(3) The interest in land acquired pursuant to a grant from the conservancy may not be used as security for any debt incurred by the nonprofit organization unless the conservancy approves the transaction.

(4) The transfer of land acquired pursuant to a grant shall be subject to the approval of the conservancy and the execution of an agreement between the conservancy and the transferee sufficient to protect the interests of the state.

(5) The state shall have a right of entry and power of termination in and over all interests in real property acquired with state funds, which may be exercised if any essential term or condition of the grant is violated.

(6) If the existence of the nonprofit organization is terminated for any reason, title to all interest in real property acquired with state funds shall immediately vest in the state, except that, prior to that termination, another public agency or nonprofit organization may receive title to all or a portion of that interest in real property, by recording its acceptance of title, together with the conservancy’s approval, in writing.

(c) Any deed or other instrument of conveyance whereby real property is acquired by a nonprofit organization pursuant to this section shall be recorded and shall set forth the executory interest or right of entry on the part of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 610, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

32538.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the conservancy may lease, rent, sell, exchange, or otherwise transfer any real property or interest therein or option acquired under this division to a local public agency, state agency, federal agency, nonprofit organization, individual, or other entity for management purposes pursuant to terms and conditions approved by the conservancy. The conservancy may request the Director of General Services to undertake these actions on its behalf.

(b) The conservancy may initiate, negotiate, and participate in agreements for the management of land under its ownership or control with local public agencies, state agencies, federal agencies, nonprofit organizations, individuals, or other entities and may enter into any other agreements authorized by state or federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 610, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 22.7. BALDWIN HILLS AND URBAN WATERSHEDS CONSERVANCY ACT [32550. - 32579.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [32550. - 32551.]

32550.

This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 714, Sec. 2.   (SB 1052)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

32551.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel area within the County of Los Angeles and the Cities of Los Angeles and Culver City, among other cities, constitutes an area with unique and important cultural, scientific, educational, recreational, and scenic resources, and includes land with the highest elevation in the Los Angeles Basin.

(b) The state recognized the importance of, and the need for, recreational venues in this area by purchasing and establishing the Kenneth Hahn State Recreation Area in 1983, which is under the jurisdiction of the Department of Parks and Recreation.
 The County of Los Angeles operates the state recreation area pursuant to a contract with the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(c) In recognition of the evolving community needs in the Baldwin Hills area, in 1999 the Legislature directed the review and revision of the master plan for the existing state recreation area as well as the acquisition of other lands in the Baldwin Hills.

(d) As one of the last remaining urban open spaces in the County of Los Angeles, the Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel area should be held in trust to be preserved and enhanced for the enjoyment of, and appreciation by, present and future generations.

(e) The Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy should be created to develop and coordinate an integrated program of resources stewardship
 so that the Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel area is managed for its optimum recreational and natural resource values based upon the needs and desires of the surrounding community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 714, Sec. 3.   (SB 1052)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [32553. - 32553.]

32553.

As used in this division, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) (1) “Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel area” means the land area currently from the Santa Monica Freeway (Interstate 10) to the Harbor Freeway and Transit Way (Interstate 110), to Manchester Boulevard and Firestone Boulevard to Lincoln Boulevard (or Interstate 105), which includes the Kenneth Hahn State Recreation Area, the southern portion of the Ballona Creek Watershed, the Upper Dominguez Channel, and the Baldwin Hills community. “Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel area” also includes Ballona Creek and adjacent property within 50 yards of Ballona Creek on either
 side, from the Santa Monica Freeway (Interstate 10) to the Marina Freeway (Interstate 90). Ballona Creek is included in the Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel area for purposes of connectivity.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the following terms shall apply:

(A) “Southern Ballona Creek Watershed” means an approximately 40-square-mile portion of the area of land with the hydrologic unit code of 180701040300 including the Ballona Creek, a nine-mile long flood protection channel, including 50 yards on both sides of the channel for right-of-way, trail access, and greening. The physical boundaries are reflected in the Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy maps and are described as follows: The northern boundary is the Santa Monica Freeway (Interstate 10); the eastern boundary extends to approximately San Pedro Street and
 continues down S. Avalon Boulevard to approximately Slauson Avenue, then recedes to approximately Western Avenue; the southern boundary aligns slightly above Manchester Avenue beginning in the City of Inglewood and continues to Playa Vista, veering south along Pershing Avenue to Imperial Highway. The watershed is composed of all or parts of the Cities of Culver City, Inglewood, Los Angeles, and Santa Monica, and unincorporated areas of View Park, Windsor Hills, and Ladera Heights.

(B) “Upper Dominguez Channel” means an approximately 33-square-mile portion of the area of land with the hydrologic unit code of 180701060101 including the Laguna Dominguez Trail, a one-mile long portion of the flood protection channel that drains the Los Angeles basin. The physical boundaries are reflected in the Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy maps and are described as follows: The southern boundary aligns slightly above Manchester Avenue beginning in
 the City of Inglewood and continues to Playa Vista veering south along Pershing Avenue to Imperial Highway; the eastern boundary extends from S. Van Ness Avenue beginning in the City of Inglewood and progresses diagonally southeast to approximately Vermont Avenue at Interstate 105, and then receding back diagonally to Western Avenue at W. 135th Street; the southern boundary follows W. 135th Street and bisects the City of Hawthorne heading west to approximately S. Douglas Street into the of City of El Segundo, excluding El Segundo Beach and Dunes, the Hyperion Water Reclamation Plant, and the Los Angeles Department of Water and Power Scattergood Generating Station, as well as any land or facilities included in the Chevron Products Company El Segundo Refinery, then continues into a portion of the City of Manhattan Beach bounded by approximately Rosecrans Avenue on the north, Highland Avenue to the west, and Pacific Coast Highway (Highway 1) on the east, with Gould Avenue at the southernmost point. As